Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.010

Jurisdiction conferred on superior court—Family court proceeding defined.

Each superior court shall exercise the jurisdiction conferred by this chapter and while sitting in the exercise of such jurisdiction shall be known and referred to as the "family court." A family court proceeding under this chapter is: (1) Any proceeding under this title or any proceeding in which the family court is requested to adjudicate or enforce the rights of the parties or their children regarding the determination or modification of parenting plans, child custody, visitation, or support, or the distribution of property or obligations, or (2) concurrent with the juvenile court, any proceeding under Title 13 or chapter 28A.225 RCW.

[ 1999 c 397 s 6; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 537; 1991 c 367 s 11; 1983 c 219 s 1; 1949 c 50 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-30.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.